dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
    <pardef n="f/å__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>ås</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>å</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>åtts</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ått</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>å</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>icks</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ick</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inges</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inge</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ående</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>åendes</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ås</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>år</l><r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/e__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>es</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>etts</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ett</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ogs</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>og</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oges</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oge</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eende</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eendes</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>es</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/upa__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>upas</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upa</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upits</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upit</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>up</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upet</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upets</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upen</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upens</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upna</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upnas</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upne</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upnes</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upna</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upnas</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upna</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upnas</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öps</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öp</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öpes</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öpe</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upande</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upandes</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upes</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ups</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>uper</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upes</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upe</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tillmötesgå"><i>tillmötesg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="angå"><i>ang</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bele"><i>bel</i><par n="l/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undfå"><i>undf</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pågå"><i>påg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hånle"><i>hånl</i><par n="l/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fortgå"><i>fortg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="övergå"><i>överg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bortgå"><i>bortg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="återfå"><i>återf</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="frångå"><i>frång</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undgå"><i>undg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utfå"><i>utf</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="supa"><i>s</i><par n="s/upa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tillgå"><i>tillg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="småle"><i>smål</i><par n="l/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vidgå"><i>vidg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="få"><i>f</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="insupa"><i>ins</i><par n="s/upa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="le"><i>l</i><par n="l/e__vblex"/></e>
